District of Columbia statutes.
9-1217.14

Repealed

Public notice of proceedings; service; appointment of guardian ad litem

Repealed.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 719, 30 DCR 148
1981 Ed., §§ 7-218, 7-219.
1981 Ed., §§ 7-215, 7-216.
1981 Ed., §§ 7-202 to 7-214.